pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Dança: Barras de balé; Mastros de pole dance; Equipamentos de proteção para dança; Equipamentos de treinamento para dança; Intensificadores de aderência para dança; Sapatos de dança; Bastões de twirling
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Tánc: Balettkorlátok; Táncrudak; Tánc védőfelszerelések; Tánc edzőfelszerelések; Táncos tapadásjavítók; Tánccipők; Mazsorettbotok
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 舞蹈: 芭蕾舞扶手; 鋼管舞桿; 舞蹈護具; 舞蹈訓練器材; 舞蹈防滑劑; 舞鞋; 旋轉指揮棒
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Ples: Šipke za balet; Plesne šipke; Zaštitna oprema za ples; Oprema za vježbanje plesanja; Pojačivači hvata za plesanje; Cipele za ples; Vrteće palice
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Dansing: Ballettstenger; Dansestenger; Beskyttelsesutstyr for dans; Treningsutstyr for dans; Grepforbedrende midler for dans; Dansesko; Drillstaver
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Χορός: Μπάρες μπαλέτου; Στύλοι χορού; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός χορού; Εξοπλισμός προπόνησης χορού; Ενισχυτικά λαβής για χορό; Παπούτσια χορού; Μπατόν χορού
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > เต้น: บาร์บัลเลต์; เสาเต้น; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันตัวสำหรับการเต้น; อุปกรณ์ฝึกเต้น; ผลิตภัณฑ์กันลื่นสำหรับการเต้น; รองเท้าเต้นรำ; คทาดรัมเมเยอร์
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Танци: Станки за балет; Танцови пилони; Защитна екипировка за танци; Оборудване за танцово обучение; Антиплъзгащи средства за танци; Обувки за танци; Въртящи се палки
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Taniec: Poręcze baletowe; Rury do tańca; Sprzęt ochronny do tańca; Sprzęt treningowy do tańca; Środki zwiększające przyczepność do tańca; Buty do tańca; Pałeczki mażoretkowe
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Dansen: Balletbarres; Danspalen; Beschermende danskleding; Trainingsuitrusting voor dans; Gripverbeteraars voor dans; Dansschoenen; Twirling batons
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Dancing: Ballet Barres; Dance Poles; Dance Protective Gear; Dance Training Equipment; Dancing Grip Enhancers; Dancing Shoes; Twirling Batons
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Dança: Barras de ballet; Varões de dança; Equipamento de proteção para dança; Equipamento de treino para dança; Potenciadores de aderência para dança; Calçado de dança; Bastões de twirling
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Baile: Barras de ballet; Tubos de pole dance; Equipo de protección para baile; Equipo de entrenamiento para baile; Potenciadores de agarre para baile; Calzado de baile; Bastones de majorette
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Tanec: Baletní tyče; Taneční tyče; Taneční chrániče; Taneční tréninkové vybavení; Přípravky pro lepší úchop při tanci; Taneční boty; Twirlingové hůlky
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Danza: Sbarre da danza; Pali da pole dance; Protezioni da danza; Attrezzatura da allenamento per la danza; Antiscivolo per danza; Scarpe da ballo; Bastoni da twirling
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Danse: Barres de danse; Barres de pole dance; Équipement de protection de danse; Matériel d'entraînement de danse; Produits d'adhérence pour la danse; Chaussures de danse; Bâtons de twirling
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 舞蹈: 芭蕾把杆; 舞蹈钢管; 舞蹈防护装备; 舞蹈训练设备; 舞蹈防滑粉; 舞鞋; 旋转指挥棒
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 무용: 발레 바; 댄스 폴; 댄스 보호 장구; 댄스 훈련 장비; 댄싱 그립 강화제; 댄싱화; 트월링 바톤
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Dans: Balletstænger; Dansestænger; Beskyttelsesudstyr til dans; Træningsudstyr til dans; Grebsforbedrere til dans; Dansesko; Twirling-stave
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Ples: Drogovi za balet; Drogovi za ples; Zaščitna oprema za ples; Oprema za vadbo plesa; Izboljševalci oprijema pri plesu; Plesni čevlji; Palice za vrtenje
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Šokiai: Baleto turėklai; Šokių stulpai; Šokių apsauginė įranga; Šokių treniruočių įranga; Šokių sukibimo gerinimo priemonės; Šokių bateliai; Sukamosios lazdos
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Dans: Balettstänger; Dansstänger; Skyddsutrustning för dans; Träningsredskap för dans; Greppförbättrare för dans; Dansskor; Drillstavar
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Tanssi: Balettitangot; Tanssitangot; Tanssin suojavarusteet; Tanssin harjoitusvälineet; Tanssin pitotehosteet; Tanssikengät; Drillisauvat
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Танцы: Балетные станки; Пилоны для танцев; Защитная экипировка для танцев; Тренажеры и инвентарь для танцев; Средства для улучшения сцепления (танцы); Обувь для танцев; Жезлы для твирлинга
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Khiêu vũ: Giàn thanh gỗ tập múa ba lê; Cột múa; Đồ bảo hộ nhảy; Dụng cụ tập nhảy; Chất tăng độ bám khi nhảy; Giày khiêu vũ; Gậy múa xoay
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Tanec: Baletné tyče; Tanečné tyče; Ochranné vybavenie na tanec; Vybavenie na tanečný tréning; Pomôcky na zlepšenie úchopu pri tanci; Tanečná obuv; Žonglovacie palice
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ダンス: バレエバー; ダンスポール; ダンス用プロテクター; ダンス用トレーニング器具; ダンス用滑り止め; ダンスシューズ; トワリングバトン
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Tanzen: Ballettstangen; Tanzstangen; Schutzausrüstung für den Tanzsport; Tanz-Trainingsgeräte; Grip-Verstärker für den Tanzsport; Tanzschuhe; Twirling-Stäbe
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Dans: Bare pentru balet; Bare pentru dans; Echipament de protecție pentru dans; Echipamente de antrenament pentru dans; Produse pentru îmbunătățirea aderenței la dans; Pantofi de dans; Măciuci pentru dans
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Dans: Bale Barları; Dans direkleri; Dans koruyucu ekipmanları; Dans antrenman ekipmanları; Dans için tutuş artırıcılar; Dans Ayakkabıları; Çevirme asaları